Colorado statutes. TITLE 25.5 Health Care Policy and Financing
ARTICLE 4
COLORADO MEDICAL ASSISTANCE ACT -
GENERAL MEDICAL ASSISTANCE

Editor's note:

This article was added with relocations in 2006 containing provisions of some sections formerly located in article 4 of title 26 or in article 1 of this title. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated. For a detailed comparison of this article, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

Section

PART 1 GENERAL PROVISIONS

PART 2 ADMINISTRATION

PART 3 RECOVERY

PART 4 PROVIDERS - REIMBURSEMENT

PART 5 STATE PLAN AMENDMENTS - WAIVER AUTHORITY